Missouri, session 2026, HB1749.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 34.074, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 34.069 and 34.074, to read as follows:
34.069. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Honorably discharged veteran", any individual who is honorably
discharged from any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States as certified by
the appropriate federal agency responsible for the administration of veterans' affairs;
(2) "Honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise":
(a) A sole proprietorship owned and controlled by an honorably discharged
veteran;
(b) A partnership or joint venture owned and controlled by honorably
discharged veterans in which at least fifty-one percent of the ownership interest is held
by honorably discharged veterans and the management and daily business operations
are controlled by one or more of the honorably discharged veteran owners; or
(c) A corporation or other entity:
a. At least fifty-one percent of which is owned by one or more honorably
discharged veterans or, if stock is issued, at least fifty-one percent of the stock is owned
by one or more honorably discharged veterans; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1749 2
b. Whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or
more of the honorably discharged veteran owners.
2. In letting contracts for the performance of any job or service, all agencies,
departments, institutions, and other entities of this state and of each political subdivision
of this state shall give a three-point bonus preference to honorably discharged veteran-
owned enterprises that are doing business as Missouri firms, corporations, or
individuals or that maintain Missouri offices or places of business.
3. In implementing the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, the following
provisions shall apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the goal of three percent of all
such contracts described in subsection 2 of this section to be let to honorably discharged
veteran-owned enterprises;
(2) If no or an insufficient number of honorably discharged veteran-owned
enterprises submit a bid or proposal for a contract let by an agency, department,
institution, or other entity of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, such goal
shall not be required and the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not
apply; and
(3) Any honorably discharged veteran-owned enterprise that receives bonus
points under this section shall not receive bonus points under section 34.074.
4. The commissioner of administration may promulgate rules to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
34.074. 1. As used in this section, the term "service-disabled veteran" means any
individual who is disabled as certified by the appropriate federal agency responsible for the
administration of veterans' affairs.
2. As used in this section, the term "service-disabled veteran business" means a
business concern:
(1) Not less than fifty-one percent of which is owned by one or more service-disabled
veterans or, in the case of any publicly owned business, not less than fifty-one percent of the
stock of which is owned by one or more service-disabled veterans; and

HB 1749 3
(2) The management and daily business operations of which are controlled by one or
more service-disabled veterans.
3. In letting contracts for the performance of any job or service, all agencies,
departments, institutions, and other entities of this state and of each political subdivision of
this state shall give a three-point bonus preference to service-disabled veteran businesses
doing business as Missouri firms, corporations, or individuals, or which maintain Missouri
offices or places of business.
4. In implementing the provisions of subsection 3 of this section, the following shall
apply:
(1) The commissioner of administration shall have the goal of three percent of all
such contracts described in subsection 3 of this section to be let to such veterans;
(2) If no or an insufficient number of such veterans doing business in this state submit
a bid or proposal for a contract let by an agency, department, institution, or other entity of the
state or a political subdivision, such goal shall not be required and the provisions of
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply; and
(3) Any service-disabled veteran business that receives bonus points under this
section shall not receive bonus points under section 34.069.
5. The commissioner of administration may promulgate rules in order to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant
of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2010, shall be
invalid and void.
✔